District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

48-1005

Penalties.

Repealed.

History

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-270, § 6, 43 DCR 4493
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 253, 60 DCR 2064
May 6, 2015, D.C. Law 20-274, § 3, 61 DCR 12117

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-585.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $300”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 48-1001.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 253 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.